Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2606
Collateral costs, defined.

Collateral costs means expenses incurred by an assistive device lessor or a consumer in connection with the repair of a nonconformity, including the costs of sales tax and of obtaining an alternative assistive device.

Laws 1997, LB 802, § 6.